Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 3
COMPETENCY OF PERSONS TO BE EXECUTED

16-8-301 to 16-8-307. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire part repealed, p. 1463, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This part 3 was added in 2001 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2002. For the text of this part 3 prior to 2002, consult the 2001 Colorado Revised Statutes. The provisions of this part 3 were relocated to part 14 of article 1.3 of title 18. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following each section in said part 14 and the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act repealing this part 3, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.